Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1031.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Parts VII and VIII of Article IV of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, are repealed:[PART VIIPENALTIESSection 410. Penalties.--(a) Any person violating any of the provisions of section 409 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall, upon conviction thereof, be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) and costs of 123456789101112131415161718192021222324 prosecution, or to undergo imprisonment for not more than six months, or both.(b) Any person who shall wilfully make a false and fraudulent return of taxable income made taxable by this article, shall be guilty of wilful and corrupt perjury, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be subject to punishment as provided by law. Such penalty shall be in addition to any other penalties imposed by this article.(c) Any person, who wilfully fails, neglects, or refuses to make a report or to pay the tax as herein prescribed, or who shall refuse to permit the department to examine the books, papers, and records of any corporation liable to pay tax under this article, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) and costs of prosecution, or to undergo imprisonment not exceeding six months, or both. Such penalty shall be in addition to any other penalties imposed by this article.PART VIIIREPEALER; EFFECTIVE DATESection 411. Repeal.--The act of May 16, 1935 (P.L.208), known as the "Corporate Net Income Tax Act," is repealed.Section 412. Effective Date.--This article shall take effect immediately, and the tax imposed shall apply to taxable years beginning January 1, 1971 and thereafter.]Section 2. Article IV of the act is amended by adding parts to read:PART IXNET OPERATING LOSS TRANSFER PROGRAMSection 421. Definitions.20250SB1031PN1196 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The following words and phrases when used in this part shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Allowable expenditures." Costs incurred in connection with the operation of an eligible business, including the expenses of fixed assets, such as the construction, acquisition and development of real estate, materials, start-up, tenant fit-out, working capital, salaries and research and development expenditures."Biotechnology." The continually expanding body of fundamental knowledge about the functioning of biological systems from the macro level to the molecular and subatomic levels, including novel products, services, technologies and subtechnologies developed as a result of insights gained from research advances, which add to that body of fundamental knowledge."Biotechnology business." A person that:(1) does business in this Commonwealth and files a corporate net income tax return under this article; and(2) is engaged in either of the following:(i) the research, development, production or provision of biotechnology for the purpose of developing or providing products or processes for specific commercial or public purposes, including medical, pharmaceutical, nutritional and other health-related purposes, agricultural purposes and environmental purposes; or(ii) the provision of services or products necessar y for research, development, production or the provision of a technology or biotechnology business.20250SB1031PN1196 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Eligible business." A biotechnology business or technology business that, as of June 30 of the year in which the biotechnology business or technology business files an application for the program:(1) has been in operation in this Commonwealth for no more than seven years; and (2) has at least 30% of its total United States full- time employees working in this Commonwealth."Eligible net loss." The amount of net loss accrued by a selling taxpayer that would otherwise be allowable as a deduction from taxable income under section 401(3), which the selling taxpayer is eligible to transfer under this part."Exchange funds." Funds received by an eligible business through the program in exchange for the sale of eligible net losses, which funds must be spent by the eligible business on allowable expenditures. The term shall not include a loan."Fixed assets." The construction, acquisition and development of real estate, materials, start-up, tenant fit-out, working capital, salaries, research and development expenditures and any other expenses determined by the department to be necessary to carry out the purposes of the program."Full-time employee." As follows:(1) An individual who:(i) is employed by an eligible business for consideration for at least 35 hours a week;(ii) renders any other standard of service generally accepted by custom or practice as full-time employment and whose wages are subject to withholding as provided 20250SB1031PN1196 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under 26 U.S.C. § 1400Z-2(c) (relating to special rules for capital gains invested in opportunity zones); or(iii) renders any other standard of service generally accepted by custom or practice as full-time employment and whose distributive share of income, gain, loss or deduction, or whose guaranteed payments, or any combination thereof, is subject to tax under this article.(2) The term does not include a person who works as an independent contractor or on a consulting basis for an eligible business."Program." The Net Operating Loss Transfer Program established under section 422."Purchasing taxpayer." A taxpayer that purchases tax benefits under this part."Selling taxpayer." A taxpayer that is an eligible business and sells eligible net losses under this part. "Tax benefit." The amount of eligible net loss multiplied by the corporate net income tax rate under section 402 that is in effect during the taxable year in which the tax benefit is being sold."Technology business." A business that:(1) does business in this Commonwealth and files a corporate net income tax return under this article;(2) owns, has filed for or has a valid license to use protected, proprietary intellectual property; and(3) employs a combination of highly educated or trained managers and workers, or both, employed in this Commonwealth who use sophisticated scientific research service or production equipment, processes or knowledge to discover, 20250SB1031PN1196 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 develop, test, transfer or manufacture a product or service."Working capital." Liquid capital assets other than fixed assets.Section 422. Net Operating Loss Transfer Program.(a) Establishment.--(1) The Net Operating Loss Transfer Program is established in the department under which a selling taxpayer may sell eligible net losses and a purchasing taxpayer may receive tax benefits.(2) Tax benefits may be used by a purchasing taxpayer in accordance with the program. A purchasing taxpayer may apply the tax benefits to the purchasing taxpayer's tax liability for the taxable year during which the tax benefits were purchased, except that any tax benefits received by the purchasing taxpayer plus any other net loss deduction allowable under this article may not cause the purchasing taxpayer's total net loss deduction to exceed the limits established under section 401(3).(b) Approval of sale of eligible net losses .-- (1) The department, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, shall review and approve applications by eligible businesses to sell eligible net losses . (2) A selling taxpayer's eligible net losses shall be limited to those which the selling taxpayer requests to transfer in its application to the department and may not, in total, exceed the maximum amount of eligible net losses that the selling taxpayer may transfer under section 427(a) . (c) Approval of purchase of tax benefits.--The department, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, shall review and approve applications for the purchase of tax benefits in an 20250SB1031PN1196 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 amount equal to at least 80% of the amount of the tax benefit that the purchasing taxpayer requests to receive.(d) Distribution of tax benefits and exchange funds.--The department shall ratably distribute tax benefits and exchange funds based on the amount of eligible net losses approved for sale and the amount committed by purchasing taxpayers during a taxable year.Section 423. Authorization to approve sale of eligible net losses . The department, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, shall approve the sale of eligible net losses , subject to section 427.Section 424. Eligibility.The department shall approve an eligible business as a selling taxpayer, if the eligible business submits an application to the department and the department, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, finds that the eligible business:(1) Meets any of the following:(i) has protected and proprietary intellectual property that is exclusive to the applicant;(ii) has use/license technology or patents developed in this Commonwealth;(iii) provides technology to the agriculture industry; or(iv) generates at least 50% of its revenue in this Commonwealth.(2) Has eligible net losses . (3) Has no positive net operating income for the past two years.20250SB1031PN1196 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Is subject to tax under this article and files all required tax returns under this article.(5) Certifies that, as of the date of the application, the applicant is operating as an eligible business and has no current intention to cease operating as an eligible business.Section 425. Application to program.(a) Fee.--An application submitted by a selling taxpayer or a purchasing taxpayer shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable $3,500 application fee. An application must be received by the department by June 30 of each fiscal year.(b) Selling taxpayer application.--An application submitted to the department by a selling taxpayer must include all of the following:(1) If the selling taxpayer was authorized to sell and sold eligible net losses during the previous taxable year, a spending certification form attesting to having spent the exchange funds on allowable expenditures.(2) An eligible net loss identification form summarizing the amount of eligible net losses to be sold and the years that the eligible net losses were accrued.(3) A form specifying how the selling taxpayer will expend the exchange funds for allowable expenditures for the operations of the eligible business.(4) A description of and business plan or presentation for the selling taxpayer's eligible business, demonstrating that the eligible business is the primary business of the selling taxpayer and that the applicant meets the definition of an eligible business. If applicable, documentation of protected proprietary intellectual property must be provided.(5) Financial statements for the two most recent full 20250SB1031PN1196 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 years of operation or, if the selling taxpayer has been in operation for less than two years, the selling taxpayer's most recent financial statement, if any.(6) A list of all affiliates and subsidiaries of the selling taxpayer. A corporation is considered to be an affiliate or subsidiary of the selling taxpayer if the corporation is subject to tax under this article and one or more of the following applies:(i) the taxpayer is an entity or an affiliated group of corporations that directly or indirectly owns or controls 50% or greater of the selling taxpayer;(ii) the taxpayer and the selling taxpayer are both members of the same consolidated group of affiliated corporations, as filed for Federal income tax purposes; or(iii) other test of affiliation as required by the department.(7) Any other information required by the department. (c) Purchasing taxpayer application.--An application submitted by a purchasing taxpayer must include all of the following:(1) The name, address and telephone number of the purchasing taxpayer.(2) A statement of the amount of tax benefits that the purchasing taxpayer requests to receive.(3) An attestation that includes the following:(i) a statement that the purchasing taxpayer has committed to the purchase of tax benefits ; (ii) the dollar amount the purchasing taxpayer will contribute, which shall be equal to at least 80% of the 20250SB1031PN1196 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 amount of the tax benefit the purchasing taxpayer requests to receive; and(iii) a statement that the purchasing taxpayer has the financial ability to contribute the amount specified under subparagraph (ii).(4) A statement of the total amount of unused net operating loss carryover, if any, that the purchasing taxpayer has accrued.(5) A list of all affiliates and subsidiaries of the purchasing taxpayer. A corporation is considered to be an affiliate or subsidiary of the purchasing taxpayer if the corporation is subject to tax under this article and one or more of the following applies:(i) the corporation is an entity or an affiliated group of corporations that directly or indirectly owns or controls 50% or greater of the purchasing taxpayer;(ii) the corporation and the purchasing taxpayer are both members of the same consolidated group of affiliated corporations, as filed for Federal income tax purposes; or(iii) any other test of affiliation as determined by the department.(6) Other information required by the department.Section 426. Review of applications.(a) Review of application.--The department, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, shall review a program application received by the department to determine whether the application meets all of the requirements of this part.(b) Approval.--The department shall approve an application and shall notify a selling taxpayer or a purchasing taxpayer of 20250SB1031PN1196 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the approval if:(1) The application was received on or before the June 30 deadline.(2) The applicant meets all of the requirements of this part.(c) Denial.--The department shall deny an application if one or more of the following applies:(1) The application was received after the June 30 deadline.(2) The applicant does not meet all of the requirements of this part.(3) The selling taxpayer has demonstrated positive net operating income in any of the two previous full years of ongoing operations as determined on its financial statements issued in a manner as determined by the department.Section 427. Limitations.(a) On selling taxpayer.--(1) A selling taxpayer shall be subject to a lifetime cap of $20,000,000 in eligible net losses that the selling taxpayer may transfer . (2) During each taxable year, a selling taxpayer that meets all eligibility requirements shall be permitted to sell an amount of eligible net losses that may not exceed the lifetime cap over a period of five taxable years.(3) The amount of eligible net losses sold by a selling taxpayer per taxable year may not exceed $5,000,000, except if all selling taxpayers have sold their annual eligible net losses and there remains additional purchasing taxpayer demand under subsection (c) , the department shall allow selling taxpayers to exceed the individual selling taxpayer 20250SB1031PN1196 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 annual cap and shall award the additional cap demand on a pro rata basis.(b) On purchasing taxpayer.--Tax benefits awarded to a purchasing taxpayer shall be reduced by the percentage of available tax benefits sold by selling taxpayers that are affiliates or subsidiaries of the purchasing taxpayer, pursuant to the information provided on the application materials required under section 425.(c) Annual program limitation on transferable net losses.--A maximum of $200,000,000 in transferable net losses shall be available for sale per taxable year.Section 428. Repayment of exchange funds . (a) Forfeiture.--If a selling taxpayer fails to use the exchange funds received for the sale of eligible net losses in a manner prescribed under this part, or fails to continue doing business in this Commonwealth during the five years following receipt of the exchange funds , the selling taxpayer shall forfeit and remit the exchange funds to the department in accordance with subsections (c) and (d).(b) Exception.--The forfeiture requirement in subsection (a) pertaining to the failure to continue doing business in this Commonwealth shall not apply if the failure is due to the liquidation of the eligible business.(c) Prorated certificate.--If a selling taxpayer fails to continue doing business in this Commonwealth during the five years following the receipt of the private financial assistance, the Department of Revenue shall allow the selling taxpayer to retain 20% of the exchange funds for each full year the selling taxpayer conducted business in this Commonwealth, except that the selling taxpayer forfeits and remits to the department the 20250SB1031PN1196 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 remaining amount of the exchange funds . (d) Failure to use benefits.--If a selling taxpayer uses the exchange funds for expenditures that are not allowable expenditures, the department shall require the selling taxpayer to remit 100% of the amount of the expenditures that are not allowable expenditures.Section 429. Fraudulent application information.A selling taxpayer or purchasing taxpayer that, with intent to defraud the Commonwealth, willfully submits or causes to be submitted, a program application under section 425 which contains false information commits a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding $2,000 or undergo imprisonment not exceeding three years, or both.Section 430. Report.(a) Duty.--Not later than one year following the effective date of this section, and not later than March 1 of each year thereafter, the department, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, shall prepare a report on the program.(b) Contents.--The report shall include:(1) A description of the demand for the program.(2) The efforts made by the department to promote the program.(3) The total amount of eligible net losses approved for sale and the total amount of tax benefits purchased under the program.(4) An assessment of the effectiveness of the program in meeting the goals of this part.(c) Submission.--The department shall submit the report to the Governor and the General Assembly, including recommendations 20250SB1031PN1196 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for legislation to improve the effectiveness of the program.Section 431. Guidelines.The department, in consultation with the Department of Revenue, shall develop written guidelines for the implementation of this part.PART XPENALTIESSection 481. Penalties.A person that:(1) Violates section 409 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding $1,000 and costs of prosecution, or to imprisonment for not more than six months, or both.(2) Willfully makes a false and fraudulent return of taxable income made taxable by this article, shall be guilty of willful and corrupt perjury and, upon conviction, be subject to punishment as provided by law.(3) Willfully fails, neglects or refuses to make a report or to pay the tax as prescribed or refuses to permit the department to examine the books, papers and records of any corporation liable to pay tax under this article, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $1,000 and costs of prosecution, or to imprisonment for not more than six months, or both.The penalties under this section shall be in addition to any other penalties imposed by this article.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1031PN1196 - 14 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728